North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-15 Verdict, Forms, Direction of [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure and
transferred to other sections of the Code]

28-15-01.
General and special verdict defined. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 49.

28-15-02.
When special verdicts directed — Special findings — How prepared. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 49.

28-15-03.
General verdict accompanied by answer to interrogatories. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 49.

28-15-04.
Jury to find amount — Assessment when judgment rendered on pleadings. [Repealed]

Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure generally.

28-15-05.
Specific personal property — Jury to find value and damages. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 32-07-12.

28-15-06.
How verdict received — Polling jurors. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 28-14-23.

28-15-07.
Correcting verdict. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 28-14-24.

28-15-08.
Verdict and entries. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 28-14-25.

28-15-09.
Motion for directed verdict. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 50.

28-15-10.
Motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict or for judgment in accordance with motion for directed verdict. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 50.

28-15-11.
Orders separately reviewable on appeal. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

Note.

The provisions of this section were reinserted as section 28-27-29.1.